Utah statutes.
32B-10-303.   Specific application and renewal requirements for public service permit.

(1)  To obtain a public service permit, in addition to complying with Section 32B-10-202, a person shall submit to the department:

(a)  a statement of the total of regularly numbered flights, trains, buses, boats, or other types of public conveyance for which the person plans to use the special use permit;

(b)  a floor plan of any room or facility in which the person plans to establish a hospitality room where the sale, offer for sale, or furnishing of an alcoholic product is made to a patron then in transit, using the host company's airline, railroad, bus, boat, or other public conveyance; and

(c)  evidence of proximity of a proposed hospitality room to the arrival and departure area used by a person traveling on the host company's airline, railroad, bus, boat, or other public conveyance.

(2) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for a public service permit is $75.

(b)  The initial permit fee for a public service permit is $250.

(c)  The bond amount required for a public service permittee is the penal sum of $1,000.

(3) (a)  To renew a public service permit, a person shall comply with Section 32B-10-203.

(b)  The renewal fee for a public service permit is $30 for each regularly numbered passenger airplane flight, passenger train, bus, boat, or any other regularly scheduled public conveyance upon which an alcoholic product is sold, offered for sale, or furnished.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

